Washington statutes.
RCW 18.270.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Certificate" means a certificate of competency granted by the director under the terms of this chapter, and is valid within the state and all political subdivisions, and meets all of the requirements for license or certification that may be applied by the political subdivisions.

(2) "Contractor" means any person, corporation, or other entity, licensed under chapter 18.160 RCW, which performs any work covered by the provisions of this chapter.

(3) "Director" means the state director of fire protection.

(4) "Fire protection sprinkler fitting" means installing, altering, and repairing sprinkler, standpipe, hose, or other hazard systems for fire protection purposes that are an assembly of piping or conduit beginning at the connection to the primary water supply within a building, sprinkler tank heaters, air lines, and all tanks and pumps attached thereto.

(5) "Journey-level sprinkler fitter" means any person who has been issued a certificate by the director as provided by this chapter.

(6) "NFPA 13-D" means the standard in use by the national fire protection association for the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in one and two-family dwellings and manufactured homes whenever the provisions of this chapter are applied.

(7) "NFPA 13-R" means the standard in use by the national fire protection association for the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in residential dwellings up to and including four stories in height whenever the provisions of this chapter are applied.

(8) "Person" means a natural person, including an owner, manager, partner, officer, employee, or occupant.

(9) "Residential sprinkler fitter" means anyone who has been issued a certificate by the director limited to installation, maintenance, and repair of the fire protection sprinkler system of residential occupancies as defined by NFPA 13-D and NFPA 13-R.

(10) "Trainee" means anyone who has been issued a training certificate by the director who is learning the fire protection sprinkler fitting trade under the direct supervision of a journey-level sprinkler fitter or residential sprinkler fitter.

[ 2007 c 435 s 1.]